Maryland, session 2025, HB0664.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment.
Italics indicate opposite chamber/conference co mm i tte e a m en dm en ts*. hb0664*

HOUSE BILL 664
Article – Health Occupations
8–6C–20.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 8–317 of this title, the Board may deny
a license OR GRANT A LICENSE, INCLUDING A LICENSE SUBJECT TO A REPRIMAND,
PROBATION, OR SUSPENSION, to [an] ANY applicant, reprimand [a] ANY licensee, place
[a] ANY licensee on probation, or suspend or revoke [a] THE license OF A LICENSEE if the
applicant or licensee:
(1) Fraudulently or deceptively obtains or attempts to obtain a license for
the applicant or for another;
(2) Fraudulently or deceptively uses a license;
(3) Is disciplined by a licensing, military, or disciplinary authority in the
State or in any other state or country or is convicted or disciplined by a court in the State
or in any other state or country for an act that would be grounds for disciplinary action
under the Board’s disciplinary statutes;
(4) Is convicted of or pleads guilty or nolo contendere to a felony or to a
crime involving moral turpitude, whether or not any appeal or other proceeding is pending
to have the conviction or plea set aside;
(5) Willfully and knowingly:
(i) Files a false report or record of an individual under the licensee’s
care;
(ii) Gives any false or misleading information about a material
matter in an employment application;
(iii) Fails to file or record any health record that is required by law;
(iv) Obstructs the filing or recording of any health record as required
by law; or
(v) Induces another person to fail to file or record any health record
as required by law;
(6) Knowingly does any act that has been determined by the Board, in its
regulations, to exceed the scope of practice authorized to the individual under this subtitle;
(7) Provides professional services while:

HOUSE BILL 664 3
(i) Under the influence of alcohol; or
(ii) Using any narcotic or controlled dangerous substance, as defined
in § 5–101 of the Criminal Law Article, or other drug that is in excess of therapeutic
amounts or without valid medical indication;
(8) Does an act that is inconsistent with generally accepted professional
standards in the practice of direct–entry midwifery;
(9) Is grossly negligent in the practice of direct–entry midwifery;
(10) Has violated any provision of this title;
(11) Submits a false statement to collect a fee;
(12) Is physically or mentally incompetent;
(13) Knowingly fails to report suspected child abuse in violation of § 5–704
of the Family Law Article;
(14) Except in an emergency life–threatening situation where it is not
feasible or practicable, fails to comply with the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention’s guidelines on universal precautions;
(15) Is in independent practice and fails to display the notice required under
§ 8–6C–23 of this subtitle;
(16) Is habitually intoxicated;
(17) Is addicted to, or habitually abuses, any narcotic or controlled
dangerous substance as defined in § 5–101 of the Criminal Law Article;
(18) Fails to cooperate with a lawful investigation conducted by the Board;
(19) Is expelled from the rehabilitation program established pursuant to §
8–208 of this title for failure to comply with the conditions of the program;
(20) Engages in conduct that violates the professional code of ethics;
(21) Is professionally incompetent;
(22) Practices direct–entry midwifery without a license, before obtaining or
renewing a license, including any period when the license has lapsed;
(23) After failing to renew a license or after a license has lapsed, commits
any act that would be grounds for disciplinary action under this section;

HOUSE BILL 664
(24) Violates regulations adopted by the Board or an order from the Board;
(25) Performs an act that is beyond the licensee’s knowledge and skills;
(26) Fails to submit to a criminal history records check in accordance with §
8–303 of this title;
(27) When acting in a supervisory position, directs another licensed
direct–entry midwife to perform an act that is beyond the licensed direct–entry midwife’s
knowledge and skills; or
(28) Fails to file a report required under this subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.